California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), if at the time the case is called for trial the defendant does not appear, either in person or by counsel, and has not requested in writing that the trial proceed in his or her absence, the court may declare the bail forfeited and may, in its discretion, order that no further proceedings be had in the case, or the court may act pursuant to Section 1043 of the Penal Code. However, if the defendant has been charged with a violation of Section 23111 or 23112, or subdivision (a) of Section 23113, and
 he or she has been previously convicted of a violation of the same section, the court may declare the bail forfeited, but shall issue a bench warrant for the arrest of the person charged, except if the magistrate finds that undue hardship will be imposed upon the defendant by requiring him or her to appear, the magistrate may declare the bail forfeited and order that no further proceedings shall be had in the case.

(b) If the defendant has posted surety bail and the magistrate has ordered the bail forfeited and that no further proceedings shall be had in the case, the bail retains the right to obtain relief from the forfeiture as provided in Section 1305 of the Penal Code if the amount of the bond, money, or property deposited exceeds seven hundred dollars ($700).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 524, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

40512.6.

(a) If a defendant who elects or is ordered to attend a traffic violator school in accordance with Section 42005 and has paid the full traffic violator school bail amount required under Section 42007 fails to successfully complete the program within the time ordered by the court or any extension thereof, the court may, following notice to the defendant, order that the fee paid
 by the defendant be converted to bail and declare the bail forfeited. The bail forfeiture under this section shall be distributed as provided by Section 42007. Upon forfeiture of the bail, the court may order that no further proceedings shall be had in the case.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2011.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 11) and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 599, Sec. 11.5.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Section operative July 1, 2011, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

40513.

(a) Whenever written notice to appear has been prepared, delivered, and filed with the court, an exact and legible duplicate copy of the notice when filed with the magistrate, in lieu of a verified complaint, shall constitute a complaint to which the defendant may plead “guilty” or “nolo contendere.”

If, however, the defendant violates his or her promise to appear in court or does not deposit lawful bail, or pleads other than “guilty” or “nolo contendere” to the offense charged, a complaint shall be
 filed that shall conform to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 948) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, which shall be deemed to be an original complaint, and thereafter proceedings shall be had as provided by law, except that a defendant may, by an agreement in writing, subscribed by him or her and filed with the court, waive the filing of a verified complaint and elect that the prosecution may proceed upon a written notice to appear.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), whenever the written notice to appear has been prepared on a form approved by the Judicial Council, an exact and legible duplicate copy of the notice when filed with the magistrate shall constitute a complaint to which the defendant may enter a plea and, if the notice to appear is verified, upon which a warrant may be issued. If the notice to appear is not verified, the defendant may, at the time of arraignment, request that a verified complaint be filed. In the case of an
 infraction violation in which the defendant is a minor, the defendant may enter a plea at the arraignment upon a written notice to appear. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the case of an infraction violation, no consent of the minor is required prior to conducting the hearing upon a written notice to appear.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 830, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

40514.

No warrant shall issue on the charge for the arrest of a person who has given his written promise to appear in court or before a person authorized to receive a deposit of bail, unless he has violated the promise, the lawfully granted continuance of his promise, or has failed to deposit bail, to appear for arraignment, trial or judgment, or to comply with the terms and provisions of the judgment, as required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

40515.

(a) When a person signs a written promise to appear or is granted a continuance of his or her promise to appear at the time and place specified in the written promise to appear or the continuance thereof, and has not posted full bail or has failed to pay an installment of bail as agreed to under Section 40510.5, the magistrate may issue and have delivered for execution a warrant for his or her arrest within 20 days after his or her failure to appear before the magistrate or pay an installment of bail as agreed, or if the person promises to
 appear before an officer authorized to accept bail other than a magistrate and fails to do so on or before the date on which he or she promised to appear, then, within 20 days after the delivery of the written promise to appear by the officer to a magistrate having jurisdiction over the offense.

(b) When the person violates his or her promise to appear before an officer authorized to receive bail other than a magistrate, the officer shall immediately deliver to a magistrate having jurisdiction over the offense charged the written promise to appear and the complaint, if any, filed by the arresting officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 738, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

40516.

(a) The expenses incurred by the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the Department of Motor Vehicles in executing any warrant issued as a result of a notice to appear issued by a member of the California Highway Patrol shall be a legal charge against the city or county in which jurisdiction the warrant was issued except where the commissioner authorizes the acceptance of a warrant for execution within 30 days of the date of its issuance.

(b) The commissioner or director shall certify to the Controller the cost of executing warrants on behalf of each city or county under this
 section. The departments shall be reimbursed for costs as provided in Section 11004.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) The peace officer to whom a warrant has been delivered for execution, upon demand, shall transfer the warrant, if it has not been executed within 30 days of the date of its issuance, to any member of the California Highway Patrol or to the Department of Motor Vehicles for execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40518.

(a) Whenever a written notice to appear has been issued by a peace officer or by a qualified employee of a law enforcement agency on a form approved by the Judicial Council for an alleged violation of Section 22451, or, based on an alleged violation of Section 21453, 21455, or 22101 recorded by an automated traffic enforcement system pursuant to Section 21455.5 or 22451, and
 delivered by mail within 15 days of the alleged violation to the current address of the registered owner of the vehicle on file with the department, with a certificate of mailing obtained as evidence of service, an exact and legible duplicate copy of the notice when filed with the magistrate shall constitute a complaint to which the defendant may enter a plea. Preparation and delivery of a notice to appear pursuant to this section is not an arrest.

(b) (1) A notice to appear shall contain the name and address of the person, the license plate number of the person’s vehicle, the violation charged, including a description of the offense, and the time and place when, and where, the person may appear in court or before a person authorized to receive a deposit of bail. The time specified shall be at least 10 days after the notice to appear is delivered. If, after the notice to appear has been issued, the citing peace officer or
 qualified employee of a law enforcement agency determines that, in the interest of justice, the citation or notice should be dismissed, the citing agency may recommend, in writing, to the magistrate or the judge that the case be dismissed. The recommendation shall cite the reasons for the recommendation and be filed with the court. If the magistrate or judge makes a finding that there are grounds for dismissal, the finding shall be entered on the record and the infraction dismissed.

(2) A notice to appear shall also contain all of the following information:

(A) The methods by which the registered owner of the vehicle or the alleged violator may view and discuss with the issuing agency, both by telephone and in person, the evidence used to substantiate the violation.

(B) The contact information of the issuing
 agency.

(c) (1) This section and Section 40520 do not preclude the issuing agency or the manufacturer or supplier of the automated traffic enforcement system from mailing a notice of nonliability to the registered owner of the vehicle or the alleged violator prior to issuing a notice to appear. The notice of nonliability shall be substantively identical to the following form: 

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: Forms relating to the Notice of 
 Nonliability appear in the hard-copy publication of the chaptered bill. 
 See Sec. 4, Chapter 735 (pp. 7–8), Statutes of 2012. 

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * (2) The form specified in paragraph (1) may be translated to other languages.

(d) A manufacturer or supplier of an automated traffic enforcement system or the governmental agency operating the system shall not alter the notice to appear or any other form approved by the Judicial Council. If a form is found to have been materially altered, the citation based on the altered form may be dismissed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 735, Sec. 4.   (SB 1303)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: See published chaptered bill for complete section text. Forms relating to the Notice of Nonliability appear on pages 7 to 8 of Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------

40519.

(a) Any person who has received a written notice to appear for an infraction may, prior to the time at which the person is required to appear, make a deposit and declare the intention to plead not guilty to the clerk of the court named in the notice to appear. The deposit shall be in the amount of bail established pursuant to Section 1269b of the Penal Code, together with any assessment required by Section
 42006 of this code or Section 1464 of the Penal Code, for the offense charged, and shall be used for the purpose of guaranteeing the appearance of the defendant at the time and place scheduled by the clerk for arraignment and for trial, and to apply toward the payment of any fine or assessment prescribed by the court in the event of conviction. The case shall thereupon be set for arraignment and trial on the same date, unless the defendant requests separate arraignment. A deposit of bail under this section does not constitute entry of a plea or a court appearance. A plea of not guilty under this section must be made in court at the arraignment.

(b) Any person who has received a written notice to appear may, prior to the time at which the person is required to appear, plead not guilty in writing in lieu of appearing in person. The written plea shall be directed to the court named in the notice to appear and, if mailed, shall be sent by certified
 or registered mail postmarked not later than five days prior to the day upon which appearance is required. The written plea and request to the court or city agency shall be accompanied by a deposit consisting of the amount of bail established pursuant to Section 1269b of the Penal Code, together with any assessment required by Section 42006 of this code or Section 1464 of the Penal Code, for that offense, which amount shall be used for the purpose of guaranteeing the appearance of the defendant at the time and place set by the court for trial and to apply toward the payment of any fine or assessment prescribed by the court in the event of conviction. Upon receipt of the plea and deposit, the case shall be set for arraignment and trial on the same date, unless the defendant requests separate arraignment. Thereafter, the case shall be conducted in the same manner as if the defendant had appeared in person, had made his or her plea in open court, and had deposited that sum as bail. The court or the clerk of the
 court shall notify the accused of the time and place of trial by first-class mail postmarked at least 10 days prior to the time set for the trial. Any person using this procedure shall be deemed to have waived the right to be tried within the statutory period.

(c) Any person using the procedure set forth in subdivision (a) or (b) shall be deemed to have given a written promise to appear at the time designated by the court for trial, and failure to appear at the trial shall constitute a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 35, Sec. 30.   (SB 174)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

40520.

(a) A notice to appear issued pursuant to Section 40518 for an alleged violation recorded by an automatic enforcement system shall contain, or be accompanied by, an affidavit of nonliability and information as to what constitutes nonliability, information as to the effect of executing the affidavit, and instructions for returning the affidavit to the issuing agency.

(b) (1) If a notice to appear is sent to a car rental or leasing company, as the registered
 owner of the vehicle, the company may return the notice of nonliability pursuant to paragraph (2), if the violation occurred when the vehicle was either leased or rented and operated by a person other than an employee of the rental or leasing company.

(2) If the affidavit of nonliability is returned to the issuing agency by the registered owner within 30 days of the mailing of the notice to appear together with the proof of a written rental agreement or lease between a bona fide renting or leasing company and its customer and that agreement identifies the renter or lessee and provides the driver’s license number, name, and address of the renter or lessee, the agency shall cancel the notice for the registered owner to appear and shall, instead, issue a notice to appear to the renter or lessee identified in the affidavit of nonliability.

(c) Nothing in this section precludes an
 issuing agency from establishing a procedure whereby registered owners, other than bona fide renting and leasing companies, may execute an affidavit of nonliability if the registered owner identifies the person who was the driver of the vehicle at the time of the alleged violation and whereby the issuing agency issues a notice to appear to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 828, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

40521.

(a) Except when personal appearance is required by the bail schedule established under Section 1269b of the Penal Code, a person to whom a notice to appear has been issued under Section 40500, who intends to forfeit bail and to pay any assessment may forward by United States mail the full amount fixed as bail, together with the appropriate amount of any assessment, to the person authorized to receive a deposit of bail. The amounts may be paid in the form of a personal check which meets the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (c) of
 Section 40510, or a bank cashier’s check or a money order. Bail and any assessment shall be paid not later than the day of appearance set forth in the notice to appear or prior to the expiration of any lawful continuance of that date.

(b) Bail forwarded by mail is effective only when the funds are actually received.

(c) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 40512 is applicable to bail paid pursuant to this section. Upon the making of the order pursuant to Section 40512 that no further proceedings be had, the amount paid as bail shall be paid into the city or county treasury, as the case may be, and the assessment shall be transmitted to the State Treasury in the manner provided in Section 1464 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 738, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

40522.

Whenever a person is arrested for violations specified in Section 40303.5 and none of the disqualifying conditions set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 40610 exist, and the officer issues a notice to appear, the notice shall specify the offense charged and note in a form approved by the Judicial Council that the charge shall be dismissed on proof of correction. If the arrested person presents, by mail or in person, proof of correction, as prescribed in Section 40616, on or before the date on which the person promised to appear, the court shall dismiss the
 violation or violations charged pursuant to Section 40303.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 258, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Notice of Violation [40600. - 40604.]

40600.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a peace officer who has successfully completed a course or courses of instruction, approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, in the investigation of traffic accidents may prepare, in triplicate, on a form approved by the Judicial Council, a written notice to appear when the peace officer has reasonable cause to believe that any person involved in a traffic accident has violated a provision of this code not declared to be a felony or a local ordinance and the violation was a factor in the occurrence of the traffic accident.

(b) A notice to appear shall contain the name and address of the person, the license number of the person’s vehicle, if any, the name and address, when available, of the registered owner or lessee of the vehicle, the offense charged, and the time and place when and where the person may appear in court or before a person authorized to receive a deposit of bail. The time specified shall be at least 10 days after the notice to appear is delivered.

(c) The preparation and delivery of a notice to appear pursuant to this section is not an arrest.

(d) For purposes of this article, a peace officer has reasonable cause to issue a written notice to appear if, as a result of the officer’s investigation, the officer has evidence, either testimonial or real, or a combination of testimonial and real, that would be sufficient to issue a written notice to appear if the officer had personally witnessed the events investigated.

(e) As used in this section, “peace officer” means any person specified under Section 830.1 or 830.2 of the Penal Code, or any reserve police officer or reserve deputy sheriff listed in Section 830.6 of the Penal Code, with the exception of members of the California National Guard.

(f) A written notice to appear prepared on a form approved by the Judicial Council and issued pursuant to this section shall be accepted by any court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 292, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

40604.

(a) If the person charged with the offense has not signed a promise to appear, no warrant for arrest may be issued following the filing of the written notice to appear issued pursuant to Section 40600, until 15 days after a notice of the filing has been served upon the person by personal delivery or by mail, addressed to the person at the address shown in the accident report.

(b) The notice shall contain the name and address of the person, the license number of the vehicle involved, the name and address, when available, of the registered owner or lessee of the vehicle, the offense shown on the written notice to appear, and the approximate time of the commission of the offense. The notice shall inform the person that, unless he or she appears in the court designated in the notice within 10 days after the service of the notice and answers the charges, a warrant will be issued for his or her arrest.

(c) Proof of service shall be made by the affidavit of any person over 18 years of age making the service showing the time, place, and manner of service and facts showing that the service was made in accordance with this section. If service is made by mail, no warrant for arrest may be issued until 14 days after the deposit of the notice of filing in the mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 107.7.   Effective September 30, 1992.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 118 of Ch. 1243.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Notice to Correct Violation [40610. - 40618.]

40610.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), if, after an arrest, crash investigation, or other law enforcement action, it appears that a violation has occurred involving a registration, license, all-terrain vehicle safety certificate, or mechanical requirement of this code, and none of the disqualifying conditions set forth in subdivision (b) exist and the investigating officer decides to take enforcement action, the officer shall prepare, in triplicate, and the violator shall sign, a written notice containing the violator’s promise to correct the alleged violation and to deliver proof of correction of the violation to the issuing agency.

(2) If a person is arrested
 for a violation of Section 4454, and none of the disqualifying conditions set forth in subdivision (b) exist, the arresting officer shall prepare, in triplicate, and the violator shall sign, a written notice containing the violator’s promise to correct the alleged violation and to deliver proof of correction of the violation to the issuing agency. In lieu of issuing a notice to correct violation pursuant to this section, the officer may issue a notice to appear, as specified in Section 40522.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), a notice to correct violation shall be issued as provided in this section or a notice to appear shall be issued as provided in Section 40522, unless the officer finds any of the following:

(1) Evidence of fraud or persistent neglect.

(2) The violation presents an immediate safety hazard.

(3) The violator does not agree to, or cannot, promptly correct the violation.

(4) The violation cited is of subdivision (a) of Section 27151 for a motorcycle.

(c) If any of the conditions set forth in subdivision (b) exist, the procedures specified in this section or Section 40522 are inapplicable, and the officer may take other appropriate enforcement action.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a), the notice to correct violation shall be on a form approved by the Judicial Council and, in addition to the owner’s or operator’s
 address and identifying information, shall contain an estimate of the reasonable time required for correction and proof of correction of the particular defect, not to exceed 30 days, or 90 days for the all-terrain vehicle safety certificate.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 595, Sec. 4.   (AB 2496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 5 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 595.)
-------------------------------------------

40610.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), if, after an arrest, crash investigation, or other law enforcement action, it appears that a violation has occurred involving a registration, license, all-terrain vehicle safety certificate, or mechanical requirement of this code, and none of the disqualifying conditions set forth in subdivision (b) exist and the investigating officer decides to take enforcement action, the officer shall prepare, in triplicate, and the violator shall sign, a written notice containing the violator’s promise to correct the alleged violation and to deliver proof of correction of the violation to the issuing agency.

(2) If a person is arrested
 for a violation of Section 4454, and none of the disqualifying conditions set forth in subdivision (b) exist, the arresting officer shall prepare, in triplicate, and the violator shall sign, a written notice containing the violator’s promise to correct the alleged violation and to deliver proof of correction of the violation to the issuing agency. In lieu of issuing a notice to correct violation pursuant to this section, the officer may issue a notice to appear, as specified in Section 40522.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), a notice to correct violation shall be issued as provided in this section or a notice to appear shall be issued as provided in Section 40522, unless the officer finds any of the following:

(1) Evidence of fraud or persistent neglect.

(2) The violation presents an immediate safety hazard.

(3) The violator does not agree to, or cannot, promptly correct the violation.

(c) If any of the conditions set forth in subdivision (b) exist, the procedures specified in this section or Section 40522 are inapplicable, and the officer may take other appropriate enforcement action.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a), the notice to correct violation shall be on a form approved by the Judicial Council and, in addition to the owner’s or operator’s address and identifying information, shall contain an estimate of the reasonable time required for correction and proof of correction of the
 particular defect, not to exceed 30 days, or 90 days for the all-terrain vehicle safety certificate.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 595, Sec. 5.   (AB 2496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

40611.

(a) Upon proof of correction of an alleged violation of Section 12500 or 12951, or any violation cited pursuant to Section 40610, or upon submission of evidence of financial responsibility pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16028, the clerk shall collect a twenty-five-dollar ($25) transaction fee for each violation. The fees shall be deposited by the clerk in accordance with Section 68084 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) For each citation, ten dollars ($10) shall be allocated monthly as follows:

(A) Thirty-three percent shall be transferred to the local governmental entity in whose jurisdiction the citation was issued for deposit in
 the general fund of the entity.

(B) Thirty-four percent shall be transferred to the State Treasury for deposit in the State Penalty Fund established by Section 1464 of the Penal Code.

(C) Thirty-three percent shall be deposited in the county general fund.

(2) The remainder of the fees collected on each citation shall be deposited in the State Court Facilities Construction Fund, established in Section 70371 of the Government Code.

(c) No fee shall be imposed pursuant to this section if the violation notice is processed only by the issuing agency and no record of the action is transmitted to the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 79, Sec. 37.   (AB 143)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

40612.

An exact, legible copy of the notice to correct shall be delivered to the alleged violator at the time he or she signs such notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1350.)
-------------------------------------------

40614.

Any person who signs a notice to correct or a certificate of correction with a false or fictitious name is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1350.)
-------------------------------------------

40616.

Any person willfully violating a written promise to correct or willfully failing to deliver proof of correction of violation is guilty of a misdemeanor. Proof of correction may consist of a certification by an authorized representative of one of the following agencies that the alleged violation has been corrected:

(a) Brake, lamp, smog device, or muffler violations may be certified as corrected by any station licensed or contracted to inspect and certify for the violation pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) of Chapter 20.3 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 27150.2.

(b) Driver license and registration violations may be certified as
 corrected by the Department of Motor Vehicles or by any clerk or deputy clerk of a court.

(c) Any violation may be certified as corrected by a police department, the California Highway Patrol, sheriff, marshal, or other law enforcement agency regularly engaged in enforcement of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 27.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

40618.

Whenever proof of correction of violation is not received by the issuing agency in accordance with Section 40610, the issuing agency may deliver the signed promise to the court having jurisdiction of the violation with a certification that no proof of correction has been received. If prepared on a form approved by the Judicial Council, the promise under Section 40610, together with the certification under this section, shall constitute a complaint to which the defendant may enter a plea, and upon which a warrant may be issued if the complaint is verified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1350.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Illegal Evidence [40800. - 40834.]



  ARTICLE 1. Prosecutions Under Code [40800. - 40808.]

40800.

(a) A traffic officer on duty for the exclusive or main purpose of enforcing the provisions of Division 10 (commencing with Section 20000) or Division 11 (commencing with Section 21000) shall wear a full distinctive uniform, and if the officer while on duty uses a motor vehicle, it shall be a distinctive color specified by the commissioner.

(b) This section does not apply to an officer assigned exclusively to the duty of investigating and securing evidence in reference to the theft of a vehicle, failure of a person to stop in the event of an accident, violation of Section 23109 or 23109.1, in reference to a felony charge, or to an officer engaged in serving a warrant when the officer
 is not engaged in patrolling the highways for the purpose of enforcing the traffic laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 59, Sec. 9.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

40801.

No peace officer or other person shall use a speed trap in arresting, or participating or assisting in the arrest of, any person for any alleged violation of this code nor shall any speed trap be used in securing evidence as to the speed of any vehicle for the purpose of an arrest or prosecution under this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40802.

(a) A “speed trap” is either of the following:

(1) A particular section of a highway measured as to distance and with boundaries marked, designated, or otherwise determined in order that the speed of a vehicle may be calculated by securing the time it takes the vehicle to travel the known distance.

(2) A particular section of a highway with a prima facie speed limit that is provided by this code or by local ordinance pursuant to Section 22352, 22354, 22357, 22358, or 22358.3, if that prima facie speed limit is not justified by an engineering and traffic survey conducted within five years prior to the date of the alleged
 violation, and enforcement of the speed limit involves the use of radar or any other electronic device that measures the speed of moving objects. This paragraph does not apply to a local street, road, school zone, senior zone, business activity district, or speed limit adopted under Section 22358.7 or 22358.8.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, a local street or road is one that is functionally classified as “local” on the “California Road System Maps,” that are approved by the Federal Highway Administration and maintained by the Department of Transportation. It may also be defined as a “local street or road” if it primarily provides access to abutting residential property and meets the following three conditions:

(A) Roadway width of not more
 than 40 feet.

(B) Not more than one-half of a mile of uninterrupted length. Interruptions shall include official traffic control signals as defined in Section 445.

(C) Not more than one traffic lane in each direction.

(2) For purposes of this section, “school zone” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22352.

(3) For purposes of this section, “senior zone” means that area approaching or passing a senior center building or other facility primarily used by senior citizens, or the grounds thereof that is contiguous to a highway and on which is posted a standard “SENIOR” warning sign, pursuant to Section 22352.

(4) For purposes of this section, “business activity district” means a section of highway described in subdivision (b) of Section 22358.9 in which a standard 25 miles per hour or 20 miles per hour speed limit sign has been posted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of that section.

(c) (1) When all of the following criteria are met, paragraph (2) of this subdivision shall be applicable and subdivision (a) shall not be applicable:

(A) When radar is used, the arresting officer has successfully completed a radar operator course of not less than 24 hours on the use of police traffic radar, and the course was approved and certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(B) When a laser or any other electronic device is used to measure the speed of moving objects, the arresting officer has successfully completed the training required in subparagraph (A) and an additional training course of not less than two hours
 approved and certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(C) (i) The prosecution proved that the arresting officer complied with subparagraphs (A) and (B) and that an engineering and traffic survey has been conducted in accordance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2). The prosecution proved that, prior to the officer issuing the notice to appear, the arresting officer established that the radar, laser, or other electronic device conformed to the requirements of subparagraph (D).

(ii) The prosecution proved the speed of the accused was unsafe for the conditions present at the time of alleged violation unless the citation was for a violation of Section 22349, 22356, or 22406.

(D) The radar, laser, or other electronic device used to measure the speed of the accused meets or exceeds the minimal operational standards of the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, and has been calibrated within the three years prior to the date of the alleged violation by an independent certified laser or radar repair and testing or calibration facility.

(2) A “speed trap” is either of the following:

(A) A particular section of a highway measured as to distance and with boundaries marked, designated, or otherwise determined in order that the speed of a vehicle may be calculated by securing the time it takes the vehicle to travel the known distance.

(B) (i) A particular section of
 a highway or state highway with a prima facie speed limit that is provided by this code or by local ordinance under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 22352, or established under Section 22354, 22357, 22358, or 22358.3, if that prima facie speed limit is not justified by an engineering and traffic survey conducted within one of the following time periods, prior to the date of the alleged violation, and enforcement of the speed limit involves the use of radar or any other electronic device that measures the speed of moving objects:

(I) Except as specified in subclause (II), seven years.

(II) If an engineering and traffic survey was conducted more than seven years prior to the date of the alleged violation, and a registered engineer evaluates the section of the highway and determines
 that no significant changes in roadway or traffic conditions have occurred, including, but not limited to, changes in adjoining property or land use, roadway width, or traffic volume, 14 years.

(ii) This subparagraph does not apply to a local street, road, or school zone, senior zone, business activity district, or speed limit adopted under Section 22358.4, 22358.7, or 22358.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 555, Sec. 5.   (AB 382)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

40803.

(a) No evidence as to the speed of a vehicle upon a highway shall be admitted in any court upon the trial of any person in any prosecution under this code upon a charge involving the speed of a vehicle when the evidence is based upon or obtained from or by the maintenance or use of a speedtrap.

(b) In any prosecution under this code of a charge involving the speed of a vehicle, where enforcement involves the use of radar or other electronic devices which measure the speed of moving objects, the prosecution shall establish, as part of its prima facie case, that the evidence or testimony presented is not based upon a speedtrap as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 40802.

(c) When a traffic and engineering survey is required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 40802, evidence that a traffic and engineering survey has been conducted within five years of the date of the alleged violation or evidence that the offense was committed on a local street or road as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 40802 shall constitute a prima facie case that the evidence or testimony is not based upon a speedtrap as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 40802.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 147.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

40804.

(a) In any prosecution under this code upon a charge involving the speed of a vehicle, an officer or other person shall be incompetent as a witness if the testimony is based upon or obtained from or by the maintenance or use of a speed trap.

(b) An officer arresting, or participating or assisting in the arrest of, a person so charged while on duty for the exclusive or main purpose of enforcing the provisions of Divisions 10 (commencing with Section 20000) and 11 (commencing with Section 21000) is incompetent as a witness if at the time of that arrest he was not wearing a distinctive uniform, or was using a motor vehicle not painted the distinctive color specified by the commissioner.
